Tennessee statutes. Title 33 Mental Health and Substance Abuse and Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Part 11

Costs in State Facilities

33-2-1101. Calculation of charges for service.

The commissioner, with the approval of the comptroller of the treasury and the commissioner of finance and administration, shall establish by rule a method for determination at least annually of charges for services and supports provided to service recipients in programs operated by the department, including the charges for all institutional or professional services.

Charges shall be calculated using generally accepted accounting principles.

Acts 1983, ch. 323, § 32; 1996, ch. 795, § 1; T.C.A., § 33-4-101; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 2, §§ 33-2-101 — 33-2-108, 33-2-201 — 33-2-202, 33-2-301 — 33-2-311, 33-2-401, 33-2-501 — 33-2-513, 33-2-601 — 33-2-602, 33-2-604, 33-2-701, 33-2-901 — 33-2-909 (Acts 1965, ch. 82, § 8; 1973, ch. 341, §§ 3, 4; 1974, ch. 802, § 8; 1975, ch. 248, §§ 1, 3; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(35); 1978, ch. 617, § 2; 1978, ch. 853, §§ 1-9, 11-13; 1979, ch. 199, § 1; 1979, ch. 369, § 1; 1981, ch. 18, § 1; 1981, ch. 98, § 5; 1981, ch. 436, §§ 1, 4, 5; 1981, ch. 436, § 3; 1982, ch. 584, §§ 2, 4-12; 1983, ch. 323, §§ 25-28, 31; 33-201, T.C.A. § 33-350, 33-1801, T.C.A., §§ 33-1803 — 33-1812, T.C.A., §§ 33-1902 — 33-1911; 1985, ch. 437, § 5, 31-32; 1987, ch. 143, §§ 1, 6; 1987, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 1987, ch. 320, § 1; 1988, ch. 586, § 1; 1988, ch. 828, §§ 3-8; 1988, ch. 875, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 253, § 3; 1989, ch. 254, § 3; 1989, ch. 255, § 2; 1989, ch. 256, § 2; 1989, ch. 257, § 3; 1989, ch. 259, § 3; 1989, ch. 260, § 3; 1989, ch. 261, § 3; 1989, ch. 271, § 3; 1989, ch. 272, § 3; 1989, ch. 434, § 5; 1989, ch. 513, §§ 1, 14; 1989, ch. 559, §§ 1-4; 1989, ch. 591, § 112; 1991, ch. 459, §§ 9, 10; 1992, ch. 913, § 2; 1993, ch. 234, §§ 22-26; 1994, ch. 760, § 1; 1996, ch. 796, § 1; 1996, ch. 1074, § 1; 1998, ch. 1005, § 1-9; 2000, ch. 947, § 6); § 33-2-603 (Acts 1985, ch. 437, § 31; 1987, ch. 143, § 5), which had been previously repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 586, § 2; § 33-2-801 (Acts 1989, ch. 513, § 4), which had been previously repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 234, § 9; §§ 33-2-802 and 33-2-803 (Acts 1989, ch. 513, § 4), which were transferred to §§ 68-24-602, 68-24-603 in 1993, is deleted and replaced in the revision of title 33 by Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1, effective March 1, 2001.

Cross-References. Definitions applicable throughout title, § 33-1-101.

33-2-1102. Determination of indigency — Periodic payments.

The commissioner, with the approval of the comptroller and the commissioner of finance and administration, shall establish rules for determining indigence and payments to be made periodically by nonindigent recipients of service or their responsible relatives.

Periodic payments by the recipient of service or the responsible relative shall be based on ability to pay as determined by factors the commissioner considers relevant.

Acts 1983, ch. 323, § 32; 1996, ch. 795, § 2; T.C.A., § 33-4-102; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-2-1103. Persons liable for charges.

If a person is a service recipient in a program operated by the department or is the parent of an unemancipated child who is a service recipient in a program operated by the department, then the person is liable for the charges for the services and supports provided.

Acts 1983, ch. 323, § 32; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), 33-4-104; Acts 1996, ch. 795, § 3; T.C.A., § 33-4-103; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Collateral References.

Constitutionality of statute imposing liability upon estate or relatives of insane person for his support in asylum. 20 A.L.R.3d 363.

Husband's liability for support and care of insane wife. 4 A.L.R. 1109.

Right of state or its political subdivision to maintain action in another state for support and maintenance of defendant's child, parent, or dependent in plaintiff's institution. 67 A.L.R.2d 771.

33-2-1104. Nonindigent recipients.

If a service recipient who is not indigent receives service from a program operated by the department, then the department shall at least annually establish an amount to be paid periodically by the service recipient and each responsible relative.

Acts 1983, ch. 323, § 32; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 33-4-106; Acts 1996, ch. 795, § 4; T.C.A., § 33-4-105; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-2-1105. Information from liable parties — Effect of failure to provide information.

The service recipient who receives services and supports, the service recipient's conservator or guardian, and persons who are legally liable for charges for services and supports shall furnish all information that the department deems necessary to determine the person's financial liability.

If a person willfully refuses to provide the information or knowingly provides false information that results in an underassessment of liability, the person is liable for the total charges for services and supports provided and for the amount of the state's expenses incurred in recovering the amounts, including attorney salaries or fees.

Acts 1983, ch. 323, § 32; 1996, ch. 795, § 5; T.C.A., § 33-4-107; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-2-1106. Person receiving services under court order.

If a service recipient obtains services and supports under a court order from a program operated by the department, the department may demand any of the service recipient's money that is in the custody of the court and credit it to the service recipient's account.

Acts 1983, ch. 323, § 32; 1996, ch. 795, § 6; T.C.A., § 33-4-108; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-2-1107. Claims against recipients.

The state has a continuing claim against the recipient of service from a program operated by the department and the recipient's estate and against responsible relatives for any unpaid difference between what the department determines the person owes and what was paid for the service provided. If the recipient of service dies, or a responsible relative of the recipient of service dies, and the commissioner presents a claim for a sum unpaid and owing to the state on account of the recipient of service, then the claim shall be paid from the estate of the deceased person.

Acts 1983, ch. 323, § 32; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), 33-4-110; Acts 1996, ch. 795, § 7; T.C.A., § 33-4-109; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Law Reviews.

1985 Tennessee Survey: Selected Developments in Tennessee Law, 53 Tenn. L. Rev. 389 (1986).

33-2-1108. Voluntary contribution of funds.

If a person who is not legally responsible to pay for a service recipient's care contributes funds voluntarily for the service recipient's care, the department may accept the funds.

Acts 1983, ch. 323, § 32; 1996, ch. 795, § 8; T.C.A., § 33-4-111; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-2-1109. Prohibition on maintenance at state's expense.

No service recipient may receive care at the expense of the state in a program operated by the department except:

One who is indigent;

A person subject to evaluation, diagnosis or treatment under chapter 5, part 5 of this title, or chapter 7, part 3 of this title and charged with a felony, or chapter 7, part 4 of this title;

A person whose service is paid for, in part, by state or federal government and the payment is conditioned on the department's acceptance of it as full satisfaction of the person's liability; or

A person whose service is paid for by the service recipient or another person or a third party and the department determines, under standards approved by the commissioner of finance and administration and the comptroller of the treasury, that the state's interests are best served by accepting payment offered as full satisfaction of the service recipient's liability.

Subdivision (a)(4) does not apply to any claim for payment for which the state has a suit pending to recover payment.

Acts 1983, ch. 323, § 32; 1996, ch. 795, § 9; T.C.A., § 33-4-112; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2002, ch. 730, § 7; 2009, ch. 531, § 33.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the operation and funding of state government and to fund the state budget for the fiscal years beginning on July 1, 2008, and July 1, 2009, please refer to Acts 2009, ch. 531.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mental Illness, Intellectual Disabilities, and Other Incapacities, § 19.

33-2-1110. Discrimination for inability to pay prohibited.

There shall be no discrimination in provision of services or supports based on inability to pay.

Acts 1983, ch. 323, § 32; 1996, ch. 795, § 10; T.C.A., § 33-4-113; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.